Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202579-3805
Athletic team or sport for female students; acts prohibited.

A government entity, licensing or accrediting organization, or athletic association shall not entertain a complaint, open an investigation, or take any other adverse action against a public or private school or a public or private postsecondary educational institution for maintaining any separate interscholastic athletic team or sport for female students.

Laws 2025, LB89, § 5.